dev/sk-nouns.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 25740
	Sdefs: 14
	Paradigms: 928
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools -standard equiv-paradigms tmp sk-nouns.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="ma" /> 
    <sdef n="mi" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="acc" /> 
    <sdef n="dat" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="ins" /> 
    <sdef n="voc" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="BASE__Eritrea">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vyvýšenin/ka__PL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ám</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ách</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ľahtikár/ka__PL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ach</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vrát/ka__PL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ach</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="krosien/ka__SG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="krosien/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vrát/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="krosien/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vrát/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vrát/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vyvýšenin/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iek</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ľahtikár/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="ľahtikár/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zlodej/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ok</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jam/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iek</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ôk</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="štrám/ka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iek</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="ľahtikár/ka__PL"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="štrám/ka__n"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="bagetka"><i>baget</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bodkočiarka"><i>bodkočiar</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cestička"><i>cestič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chvojka"><i>chvoj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chytráčka"><i>chytráč</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="denunciantka"><i>denunciant</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvierka"><i>dvier</i><par n="krosien/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvojka"><i>dvoj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dynka"><i>dyn</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dôstojníčka"><i>dôstojníč</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="džokejka"><i>džokej</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="farizejka"><i>farizej</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fluktuantka"><i>fluktuant</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guvernantka"><i>guvernant</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hodinárka"><i>hodinár</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jamka"><i>jam</i><par n="jam/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jarka"><i>jar</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jednokoľajka"><i>jednokoľaj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kajka"><i>kaj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kandidátka"><i>kandidát</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kazajka"><i>kazaj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kovbojka"><i>kovboj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kočka"><i>koč</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krosienka"><i>krosien</i><par n="krosien/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuchárka"><i>kuchár</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="linajka"><i>linaj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lokálpatriotka"><i>lokálpatriot</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mankárka"><i>mankár</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="močovka"><i>močov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nedbajka"><i>nedbaj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nemčinárka"><i>nemčinár</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ohrádka"><i>ohrád</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="organistka"><i>organist</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patricijka"><i>patricij</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perestrojka"><i>perestroj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plebejka"><i>plebej</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pletiarka"><i>pletiar</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podpaľačka"><i>podpaľač</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poľovníčka"><i>poľovníč</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="preglejka"><i>preglej</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protagonistka"><i>protagonist</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prvôstka"><i>prvôst</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pľúcka"><i>pľúc</i><par n="krosien/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rybka"><i>ryb</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samohláska"><i>samohlás</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sojka"><i>soj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spinka"><i>spin</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spoluobčianka"><i>spoluobčian</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stojka"><i>stoj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sýpka"><i>sýp</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terkelička"><i>terkelič</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terénka"><i>terén</i><par n="štrám/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tárajka"><i>táraj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veksláčka"><i>veksláč</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vetrovka"><i>vetrov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrátka"><i>vrát</i><par n="vrát/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vývojka"><i>vývoj</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="výška"><i>výš</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zjazdovka"><i>zjazdov</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="údržbárka"><i>údržbár</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čarodejka"><i>čarodej</i><par n="zlodej/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šnúročka"><i>šnúroč</i><par n="vyvýšenin/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="špeciálka"><i>špeciál</i><par n="ľahtikár/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štrámka"><i>štrám</i><par n="štrám/ka__n"/></e>
